Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 656.
SECTION 2. As used in ORS 656.018, 656.403, 656.702, 656.850, 656.855 and 737.270 and this
section:
(1) “Client worker” means an individual who performs services for compensation for  the
client of a professional employer organization.
(2) “Covered employee” means a client worker for whom a PEO has assumed  employer
responsibilities under a PEO relationship.
(3) “Direct hire  employee” means a client worker for whom a PEO has not assumed
employer responsibilities under a PEO relationship.
(4) “Multiple coordinated policy basis” means an arrangement under which  a separate
policy for workers’ compensation coverage is issued to or on behalf of each  client or group
of affiliated clients  of a PEO, which coordinates the premium obligations and stated policy
communications with respect to the policy.
(5) “PEO relationship” means an agreement between a PEO and a client  employer under
which certain employer responsibilities for  some or all of the client employer’s workers are
allocated.
(6)(a) “Professional employer organization” or “PEO”  means a person that enters into a
PEO relationship with a client employer.
(b) “Professional employer organization” or “PEO”  does not mean a person that solely
provides workers to a client on a temporary basis or a person that provides payroll proc-
essing or similar  administrative services without assuming employer responsibilities for cli-
ent workers.
(7) “Temporary basis” means providing workers to a client:
(a) For special  situations, including but not limited to employee absences, employee
leaves, professional skill shortages, seasonal  workloads and special assignments and projects
with the expectation that the position will be terminated when the special situation ends.
Enrolled House Bill 2800 (HB 2800-A) Page 1
(b) As probationary new hires with a reasonable expectation of transitioning to perma-
nent employment  with the client, if the client uses a preestablished probationary period in
its overall employment selection program.
(8) “Temporary service provider” means a person that:
(a) Regardless of the terminology the parties use to describe the  relationship, enters into
contracts with clients under which:
(A) The person provides workers to the client on a temporary basis;
(B) The worker’s contract of  employment is with the person rather than the person’s
client; and
(C) The person retains all employer  responsibilities for the worker, except to the extent
necessary to allow the person’s client to direct and control the services provided  by the
worker for the client; and
(b) Customarily attempts to reassign the person’s workers to other clients when  the
workers finish each assignment,  except for workers provided as described in subsection (7)(b)
of this section.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 656.850 is amended to read:
656.850. [(1) As used in this section and ORS 656.018, 656.403, 656.855 and 737.270: ]
[(a) “Worker leasing company” means a person  who provides workers, by contract and for a fee,
to work for  a client but does not include a person who provides workers to a client on a temporary
basis.]
[(b) “Temporary basis” means providing workers to a client for special situations  such as to cover
employee absences,  employee leaves, professional skill shortages, seasonal workloads and special as-
signments and projects with  the expectation that the position or positions will be terminated upon
completion of the  special situation. Workers also are provided on a temporary basis if they are provided
as probationary new  hires with a reasonable expectation of transitioning to permanent employment with
the client  and the client uses a preestablished probationary period in its overall employment selection
program.]
[(c) “Temporary service provider” means a person who provides workers, by contract and  for a fee,
to a client on a temporary basis. ]
[(2) No person shall perform services as a worker leasing company in this  state without first hav-
ing obtained a  license therefor from the Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
No person required  by this section to obtain a license shall fail to comply with this section or ORS
656.855, or any rule adopted pursuant thereto. ]
[(3) When a worker leasing company provides workers  to a client, the worker leasing company
shall satisfy the requirements of ORS 656.017  and 656.407 and provide workers’ compensation coverage
for those workers and any subject workers employed by the client unless during the  term of the lease
arrangement the client has proof of coverage on file  with the director that extends coverage to subject
workers employed by the client  and any workers leased by the client. If the client allows the coverage
to expire  and continues to employ subject workers or has leased workers, the client shall be considered
a noncomplying  employer unless the worker leasing company has complied with subsection (5) of this
section.]
[(4) When a worker leasing company provides workers  for a client, the worker leasing company
shall assure that the client provides adequate  training, supervision and instruction for those workers
to meet the requirements of ORS chapter 654. ]
[(5) When a worker leasing company provides  subject workers to work for a client and also pro-
vides workers’ compensation coverage for those workers, the worker leasing  company shall notify the
director in writing.  The notification shall be given in such manner as the director may prescribe. A
worker leasing company may terminate  its obligation to provide workers’ compensation coverage for
workers provided to a client by giving to the client and the director written  notice of the termination.
A notice of termination shall state the effective date and  hour of the termination, but the termination
shall be effective not less than 30 days after the notice is  received by the director. Notice to the client
under this section shall be given by mail, addressed to the client at the  client’s last-known address. If
Enrolled House Bill 2800 (HB 2800-A) Page 2
the client is a partnership, notice may be given to any of the partners.  If the client is a corporation,
notice may be given to  any agent or officer of the corporation upon whom legal process may be
served.]
(1)(a) A person may  not provide services as a professional employer organization (PEO)
in this state without first having obtained a license from the Director  of the Department of
Consumer and Business Services.
(b) No person required to obtain a license  under this section shall fail to comply with this
section or ORS 656.855 or any rule adopted pursuant to such sections.
(2)(a) When a PEO enters into a PEO relationship,  the PEO shall satisfy the require-
ments of ORS 656.017 and 656.407 and provide workers’ compensation coverage  for all of the
client’s covered employees and direct hire employees unless, during the term of the  PEO’s
agreement with the client, the client has proof of coverage on file with the director.
(b) If the client has proof of coverage on file with  the director, the client’s coverage shall
extend to all of the client’s covered employees and direct hire employees.
(c) If the client allows the coverage to expire and continues to  employ covered employees
or direct hire employees, the client shall be  considered a noncomplying employer unless the
PEO has complied with subsection (4) of this section.
(3) When a PEO enters  into a PEO relationship, the PEO shall ensure that the client
provides adequate training, supervision and instruction  for the client’s covered employees to
meet the requirements of ORS chapter 654.
(4) If  a PEO enters into a PEO relationship and the PEO is responsible for providing
workers’ compensation coverage  to the client under subsection (2) of this section, the PEO
shall:
(a) If the PEO  is a carrier-insured employer, notify the insurer in writing. The insurer
shall file proof of coverage with the  director within 30 days after workers’ compensation
coverage of the client becomes effective.
(b) If the PEO is a self-insured employer, notify the director in writing.
(5)(a) A PEO’s responsibility  to provide workers’ compensation coverage under sub-
section (2) of this section shall continue until the earlier of the date on which:
(A) The client obtains alternate coverage; or
(B) The PEO terminates its responsibility to provide coverage.
(b) For purposes  of paragraph (a)(A) of this subsection, if a client obtains alternate
workers’ compensation coverage, the PEO’s responsibility to provide coverage ends on:
(A) The effective date of a policy for which an insurer  makes a proof of coverage filing
on behalf of the employer;
(B) The date on  which another PEO becomes responsible for providing coverage to the
client; or
(C) The date on which the client becomes a self-insured employer.
(c) For purposes of paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection:
(A) A PEO may terminate its responsibility to provide coverage  by giving written notice
of the termination to:
(i) If the PEO  is a carrier-insured employer, the client, the director and the insurer. The
insurer shall file notice of termination with the director within  10 calendar days after the
effective date of the termination or the date on which the insurer receives notice from  the
PEO, whichever is later.
(ii) If the PEO is a self-insured employer, the client and the director.
(B) Unless  a later date is specified, the termination shall become effective at 12 midnight
on the 30th day after the date on which the notice is received by:
(i) An authorized representative of the insurer; or
(ii) If the PEO is a self-insured employer, the director.
Enrolled House Bill 2800 (HB 2800-A) Page 3
(6) When a PEO  satisfies its responsibility to provide workers’ compensation coverage
to a client  under subsection (2) of this section by obtaining a workers’ compensation insur-
ance policy, coverage of the client under the policy shall continue until:
(a) The PEO’s coverage under the policy ends under ORS 656.419 (4); or
(b) The PEO’s responsibility to provide workers’ compensation coverage  ends under
subsection (5) of this section.
(7)(a) A PEO shall submit reports to the director that list:
(A) All clients with which the PEO has entered into a PEO relationship;
(B) Each client to which the PEO provides workers’ compensation coverage; and
(C) The date on which the coverage begins.
(b) The director shall prescribe the interval and form of these reports by rule.
(8) The director may adopt any rules necessary for the implementation of  this section,
including but not limited to:
(a) Prescribing the form and content of notices required under this section, including
requiring electronic transmission and filing; and
(b) Requiring insurers that provide coverage to PEOs to do so on a multiple  coordinated
policy or other basis.
(9)(a) Notice to  the client under this section shall be given by mail, addressed to the cli-
ent at the client’s last-known address.
(b) If the client is a partnership, notice may be given to any of the partners.
(c) If the client is a corporation, notice may be given to  any agent or officer of the cor-
poration upon whom legal process may be served.
(d) If the client is a limited liability company, notice may be given to any manager.
(e) If the client is a member-managed  limited liability company, notice may be given to
any member.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 656.702 is amended to read:
656.702. (1)[(a)] The records of  the State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation are subject to
ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
[(b)] (2)(a) Notwithstanding ORS 192.355, the State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation  shall
make the accident experience records of the corporation  available to a bona fide rating organization
to assist in making workers’ compensation rates. Costs involved in making  the records available
shall be borne by the rating organization.
(b) Accident experience records of carrier-insured employers shall also  be available on the same
terms to assist in making such rates.
[(2)] (3) Disclosure of workers’ compensation claim records of the Department of Consumer  and
Business Services is governed by ORS 192.355 (20).
(4)(a) When records obtained by the Director of the Department  of Consumer and Busi-
ness Services indicate  that a professional employer organization’s responsibility to provide
workers’ compensation coverage to a client has been terminated under  ORS 656.850 (5)(a)(A),
the director may  disclose the name of the client and the date of termination to the profes-
sional employer organization’s insurer.
(b) Information disclosed to  an insurer under this subsection may be used only to vali-
date the accuracy of the insurer’s coverage records and may  not be disclosed to any other
party.
SECTION 5.  ORS 656.018 is amended to read:
656.018. (1)(a) Except as specifically provided otherwise in this chapter, the liability of every
employer who satisfies the duty required [ by] under ORS 656.017  (1) is exclusive and in place of all
other liability arising out of injuries, diseases, symptom complexes or similar conditions arising out
of and in the course of employment that  are sustained by subject workers, the workers’ beneficiaries
and anyone otherwise entitled to recover damages from  the employer on account of such conditions
or claims resulting  therefrom, specifically including claims for contribution or indemnity asserted
Enrolled House Bill 2800 (HB 2800-A) Page 4
by third  persons from whom damages are sought on account of such conditions[ , except as specifically
provided otherwise in this chapter ].
(b) This subsection shall  not apply to claims for indemnity or contribution asserted by a rail-
road, as defined in ORS 824.020, or by a corporation, individual  or association of individuals which
is subject to regulation [ pursuant to ] under ORS chapter 757 or 759.
(c) Except as provided in paragraph  (b) of this subsection, all agreements or warranties contrary
to the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection entered into after July 19, 1977, are void.
(2) The rights given to a subject worker  and the beneficiaries of the subject worker under this
chapter for injuries, diseases, symptom complexes or similar conditions arising  out of and in the
course of employment are in lieu of any remedies they might otherwise have  for such injuries, dis-
eases, symptom complexes or similar conditions against the worker’s employer under ORS 654.305
to 654.336 or other laws, common law  or statute, except to the extent the worker is expressly given
the right under this chapter to bring suit against the employer  of the worker for an injury, disease,
symptom complex or similar condition.
(3)(a) The exemption from liability given an employer under  this section is also extended to the
employer’s insurer, the self-insured  employer’s claims administrator, the Department of Consumer
and Business Services, and to the contracted  agents, employees, partners, limited liability company
members, general partners, limited  liability partners, limited partners, officers and directors of the
employer, the employer’s  insurer, the self-insured employer’s claims administrator and the depart-
ment.[, except that ]
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of  this subsection,  the exemption from liability shall not
apply if:
[(a)] (A) [ If] The willful and  unprovoked aggression by a person otherwise exempt under this
subsection is a substantial factor in causing  the injury, disease, symptom complex or similar condi-
tion;
[(b)] (B) [If] The worker and the person otherwise  exempt under this subsection are not engaged
in the furtherance of a common enterprise or the  accomplishment of the same or related objectives;
[(c)] (C) [If] The failure of the employer to comply with a notice posted pursuant  to ORS 654.082
is a substantial factor in causing the injury, disease, symptom complex or similar condition; or
[(d)] (D) [ If] The negligence of a  person otherwise exempt under this subsection is a substantial
factor in causing the injury, disease, symptom complex or similar condition and the  negligence oc-
curs outside of the capacity that qualifies the person for exemption under this section.
(4) The exemption  from liability given an employer under this section applies to a [ worker leas-
ing company and  the client to whom workers are provided when the worker leasing company ] pro-
fessional employer organization  and the client with which the professional employer
organization has entered into a PEO  relationship when the professional employer organiza-
tion and the client comply with ORS 656.850 [ (3)] (2).
(5)(a) The  exemption from liability given an employer under this section applies to a temporary
service provider[ , as that term is used in ORS 656.850, ] and also extends to the client  to whom
workers are provided when the temporary service provider complies with ORS 656.017.
(b)(A) The exemption from liability given a client under paragraph (a) of  this subsection is also
extended to the client’s insurer, the self-insured client’s claims administrator,  the department, and
the contracted agents, employees, officers and directors of the  client, the client’s insurer, the self-
insured client’s claims administrator and the department .[, except that ]
(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A)  of this paragraph,  the exemption from liability shall
not apply if:
[(A)] (i) [ If] The willful and unprovoked aggression by a person otherwise exempt  under this
subsection is a substantial factor in causing  the injury, disease, symptom complex or similar condi-
tion;
[(B)] (ii) [If] The worker and  the person otherwise exempt under this subsection are not engaged
in the furtherance of a common enterprise or the  accomplishment of the same or related objectives;
Enrolled House Bill 2800 (HB 2800-A) Page 5
[(C)] (iii) [ If] The  failure of the client to comply with a notice posted pursuant to ORS 654.082
is a substantial factor in causing the injury, disease, symptom complex or similar condition; or
[(D)] (iv) [If] The negligence of a person otherwise exempt under this  subsection is a substantial
factor in causing  the injury, disease, symptom complex or similar condition and the negligence oc-
curs outside of the capacity that qualifies the person for exemption under this subsection.
(6) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit payment, voluntarily or otherwise, to  injured workers
or their beneficiaries in excess of the compensation required to be paid under this chapter.
(7) The  exclusive remedy provisions and limitation on liability provisions of this chapter apply
to all injuries  and to diseases, symptom complexes or similar conditions of subject workers arising
out of and  in the course of employment whether or not they are determined to be compensable under
this chapter.
SECTION 6.  ORS 656.403 is amended to read:
656.403. (1) A self-insured employer directly assumes the  responsibility for providing compen-
sation due subject workers and their beneficiaries under this chapter.
(2) The claims of subject workers and their beneficiaries resulting  from injuries while employed
by a self-insured employer shall be handled in the manner provided by  this chapter. A self-insured
employer is subject to the  rules of the Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Ser-
vices with respect to such claims.
(3) Security deposited by a self-insured employer shall not relieve any such  employer from full
and primary responsibility for claims administration and  payment of compensation under this chap-
ter. This subsection applies to a self-insured employer even though the self-insured employer insures
or reinsures all or any portion of risks under this chapter with an insurance company authorized
to do business in this state or with any  other insurer with whom insurance can be placed or secured
pursuant to ORS 744.305 to 744.405 (1985 Replacement Part).
(4) When  a self-insured employer is a [ worker leasing company ] professional employer organ-
ization required to be licensed [ pursuant to ] by ORS  656.850 and 656.855, the [ company also shall ]
professional employer organization shall also  comply with  the [ worker leasing company ] regula-
tory provisions of ORS chapters 656 and 737 pertaining to professional  employer organizations
and with such rules as may be adopted pursuant to ORS 656.726 and 731.244 for the supervision and
regulation of [ worker leasing companies ] professional employer organizations.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 656.855 is amended to read:
656.855. (1) In accordance with any applicable provision of ORS chapter 183, the Director of the
Department of  Consumer and Business Services, by rule, shall establish a licensing system for
[worker leasing companies ] professional employer organizations.
(2) [ Such system ] The system established by the director  shall include, but not be  limited to:
(a) Prescribing the form and content of and  the times and procedures for submitting applications
for license issuance or renewal.
(b) Prescribing the term of the license and the fee for  original issuance and renewal of the li-
cense. The fees shall be set  in an amount necessary to support the administration of this section
and ORS 656.850.
(c) Prescribing those violations of this section or of ORS 656.850 for which the director may
refuse to issue or renew or may suspend or revoke a license.
(d) Prescribing the form and  contents of records a licensee is required to maintain and specify-
ing the times, places and manner of audit by the director of those records.
[(2)] (3) All moneys received by the director pursuant to this section  shall be credited to the
Consumer and  Business Services Fund and are appropriated continuously to the director to carry
out the provisions of this section and ORS 656.850.
SECTION 8.  ORS 737.270 is amended to read:
737.270. (1) When a [ worker leasing company ] professional employer organization required to
be licensed by ORS 656.850 [ provides workers  to work for ] enters into a PEO relationship with  a
client and also provides the  workers’ compensation coverage for [ those workers ] the client , the in-
Enrolled House Bill 2800 (HB 2800-A) Page 6
surance premium for the client’s  exposure shall be based on the client’s own experience rating, in
the same manner as required for employers insuring directly employed workers.
(2) An  insurer that provides workers’ compensation to a [ worker leasing company ] professional
employer organization shall maintain and report to the licensed  workers’ compensation rating or-
ganization of  which the insurer is a member separate statistical experience for each client of the
[worker leasing company ] professional employer organization  according to the uniform statistical
plan prescribed by the Director of the Department of Consumer and  Business Services according to
ORS 737.225 (4).
(3) To reimburse expenses incurred by  the insurer in segregating client experience, the insurer
shall be permitted to  charge the [ worker leasing company ] professional employer organization a
reasonable fee as determined by the director.
(4) The [ worker leasing company ] professional employer organization  shall earn a separate
experience  rating  for any administrative personnel the [ company] professional employer organ-
ization directly employs.
SECTION 9.  ORS 743.521 is amended to read:
743.521. (1)(a) A [ leasing company ] professional employer organization may offer group health
insurance to its [ leased workers ] clients’ covered employees .
(b) If the [ leasing company ] professional employer organization  does not offer group health
insurance to its  [ leased workers ] clients’ covered employees , the client employer may offer group
health insurance to the [ leased workers ] covered employees .
(2) If a [ leasing company] professional employer organization offers group health insurance to
[its leased  workers ] any of its clients’ covered employees , the [ leasing company ] professional
employer organization shall offer group health insurance to all  its [ leased workers ] clients’ cov-
ered employees in the same manner.
SECTION 10.  ORS 743.522 is amended to read:
743.522. (1) As used in this section and ORS 743.521:
(a) “Client employer” means  an employer [ to whom workers are provided under contract and for
a fee on a leased basis by  a worker leasing company ] with which a professional employer organ-
ization required to be  licensed under ORS 656.850 has a PEO relationship .
(b) “Covered employee” has the meaning given that term in section 2 of this 2025 Act.
[(b)] (c)  “Employee” may include a retired employee.
[(c) “Leased worker” means a worker provided  by a worker leasing company licensed under ORS
656.850.]
(d) “PEO relationship” has the meaning given that term in section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(e) “Professional employer organization”  has the meaning given that term in section 2
of this 2025 Act.
(2) Group health insurance may be offered  to a resident of this state under a group health in-
surance policy issued to a group other than one of the groups described in ORS 731.098 if:
(a) The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services finds that:
(A) The issuance of the policy is in the best interest of the public;
(B) The issuance of the policy would result in economies of acquisition or administration; and
(C) The benefits are reasonable in relation to the premiums charged; and
(b) The premium for the policy is paid either from funds of a  policyholder, from funds contrib-
uted by a covered person or from both.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 653.412 is amended to read:
653.412. As used in ORS 653.412 to 653.485, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Chain” means an establishment that  is part of an affiliation of two or more establishments
within the United States, each of which is owned by the same person or  entity and operate under
identical or substantially similar trade names or service marks, both as defined in ORS 647.005.
(2)(a) “Employee”  means an employee, as defined in ORS 652.310, who is employed in a retail
establishment, a hospitality establishment or a food services establishment and  is engaged in pro-
viding services relating to:
Enrolled House Bill 2800 (HB 2800-A) Page 7
(A) Retail trade, as that term is used in  the 2012 North American Industry Classification System
under code 44-45;
(B) Hotels and motels, as those terms are  used in the 2012 North American Industry Classi-
fication System under code 721110, or casino hotels, as that  term is used in the 2012 North Ameri-
can Industry Classification System under code 721120; or
(C) Food services, as that term is used in the 2012 North American Industry Classification Sys-
tem under code 722.
(b) “Employee” does not include:
(A) A salaried employee described in ORS 653.020 (3);
(B) A [ worker supplied to an employer  by a worker leasing company, ] covered employee, as de-
fined in [ ORS 656.850] section 2 of this 2025 Act ; or
(C) An employee of a business that provides services to or on behalf of an employer.
(3) “Employer” means an employer, or a successor to an employer, described in ORS 653.422 (1).
(4) “Food services establishment” means the fixed point  of sale location for establishments de-
fined in the 2012 North American Industry Classification  System under code 722 as food services
and drinking places.
(5) “Hospitality establishment” has the  meaning provided in the 2012 North American Industry
Classification System under code 721110 for hotels and motels and code 721120 for casino hotels.
(6) “On-call shift” means  any time that an employer requires an employee to be available to
work or to contact the employer or wait to be contacted by  the employer for the purpose of deter-
mining whether the employee must report to work. During  the shift, on-call status applies regardless
of whether the employee is located on or off the employer’s premises.
(7) “Regular rate of pay” means the regular hourly  rate or hourly equivalent that an employer
must pay an employee for each hour the employee works during a given  work shift, including any
shift differential pay. “Regular rate of pay” does not include:
(a) Tips;
(b) Bonuses or other incentive payments;
(c) Overtime, holiday pay or other premium rate; or
(d) Any additional compensation an employer is required to pay an employee under ORS 653.442
or 653.455.
(8) “Retail establishment” means the fixed point of sale location  for an establishment defined in
the 2012  North American Industry Classification System under codes 441110 to 453998 as a retail
trade establishment.
(9) “Shift differential pay” means a pay differential meant to compensate  an employee for work
performed under differing conditions, such as for working at night. “Shift differential pay” does  not
include any additional compensation an employer is required to pay an employee under ORS  653.442
or 653.455.
(10) “Successor” means a business or enterprise that is substantially the same entity as  the
predecessor employer according to criteria adopted by the Bureau of Labor and Industries by rule
and consistent with federal law.
(11) “Time of hire”  means the period after an offer of employment and acceptance of the offer
of employment and on or before the commencement of employment.
(12) “Work schedule” means the hours, days and times, including regular work  shifts and on-call
shifts, when an employee is required by an  employer to perform duties of employment for which the
employee will receive compensation.
(13) “Work shift” means the specific and consecutive hours the employer requires  the employee
to work.
(14) “Workweek” means a fixed period  of time established by an employer that reflects a regu-
larly recurring period of 168 hours or seven  consecutive 24-hour periods. A workweek may begin
on any day of the week and any hour of the  day and need not coincide with a calendar week. The
beginning of a workweek may be changed if the change is intended to be permanent.
Enrolled House Bill 2800 (HB 2800-A) Page 8
(15) “Writing” or “written” means a printed or printable communication in physical  or elec-
tronic format including a communication that is transmitted through  electronic mail, text message
or a computer system or is otherwise sent and stored electronically.
(16) “Year” means any fixed, consecutive 12-month period of time.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 671.525 is amended to read:
671.525. (1) An applicant for a landscape contracting business  license must qualify as an inde-
pendent contractor, under ORS 670.600,  to be licensed with the State Landscape Contractors Board.
(2) The board shall establish two classes of independent contractor licensees:
(a) The nonexempt class is composed of the following entities:
(A) Sole proprietorships,  partnerships, corporations and limited liability companies with one or
more employees; and
(B) Partnerships, corporations and limited liability  companies with more than two partners,
corporate officers or members  if any of the partners, officers or members are not part of the same
family and related as parents, spouses, siblings, children, grandchildren, sons-in-law or daughters-
in-law.
(b) The exempt class is composed of all sole proprietorships, partnerships, corporations and
limited liability companies :
(A) That do not qualify as nonexempt[ .]; or
(B) Whose workers are covered  employees for whom a professional employer organiza-
tion is responsible for providing workers’ compensation coverage under ORS 656.850.
(3) All partnerships, corporations and limited liability companies applying for a  landscape con-
tracting business license must have a federal tax identification number.
(4) If a licensee who qualifies under subsection (2)(b) of this section  hires one or more employ-
ees, or falls into any of the categories set out in subsection (2)(a)(B)  of this section, the licensee is
subject to penalties under ORS 671.997 and must submit proof that  the licensee qualifies under
subsection (2)(a) of this section.
(5) The decision of the board that a licensee is an independent contractor applies only when  the
licensee is performing work of the nature described in ORS 671.520 and 671.530.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 671.527 is amended to read:
671.527. (1) An applicant  for a landscape contracting business license that qualifies under ORS
671.525 to be classified as  a nonexempt independent contractor must provide workers’ compensation
insurance coverage for all employees of the landscape contracting business.
(2)(a) An applicant  for a landscape contracting business license that qualifies under ORS 671.525
to be classified as  an exempt independent contractor, and that [ has entered into a contract with a
worker leasing company or temporary service  provider for the supplying of workers to the landscaping
business, must verify that all leasing company or service provider employees supplied for use by  the
business are covered by workers’ compensation insurance. ] is the  client of a professional employer
organization or has contracted with a temporary service  provider to supply workers to the
landscaping business, must verify  that the professional employer organization or temporary
service provider maintains workers’ compensation insurance coverage.
(b) As used in this subsection, [ “worker leasing company” ] “professional employer  organiza-
tion”  and “temporary service provider” have the meanings given those terms [ under ORS  656.850]
in section 2 of this 2025 Act .
SECTION 14.  ORS 671.540 is amended to read:
671.540. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, ORS 671.510 to 671.760  and
671.990 (2) do not apply to:
(a) Any federal  or state agency or any political subdivision performing landscaping work on
public property.
(b) Any landscape architect registered under ORS 671.310 to 671.459  and practicing as provided
under ORS 671.310 to 671.459.
(c) Landscaping work performed by a landscape maintenance business if:
Enrolled House Bill 2800 (HB 2800-A) Page 9
(A) The landscaping work is performed  for a customer that in a calendar year receives primarily
landscape maintenance services from the business;
(B) The value of all labor, materials or other items supplied  for landscaping work at a job site
does not exceed $500 in a calendar year; and
(C) The landscaping work is of a casual, minor or inconsequential nature,  as those terms are
defined by the State Landscape Contractors Board by rule.
(d) Installation of fences, decks, arbors, driveways, walkways or retaining walls if  performed by
a person or business licensed with the Construction Contractors Board.
(e) Rough grading of plots and areas of land performed in conjunction with new  or remodeling
construction if performed by a person or  business licensed with the Construction Contractors Board.
(f) Any owner of property, or employee of an owner of  property, who contracts for landscaping
work on the property to be performed by a person licensed under ORS  671.560. The exception pro-
vided by  this paragraph does not apply to a person who, in pursuit of an independent business,
performs or contracts for the  performance of landscaping work with the intent of offering for sale
before, upon or after  completion of the landscaping work the property upon which the landscaping
work is performed.
(g) Any landscaping work performed by a person on property that the person owns or in which
the person has  a legal interest. The exception provided by this paragraph does not apply to a per-
son who, in  pursuit of an independent business, performs or contracts for the performance of land-
scaping work with  the intent of offering for sale before, upon or after completion of the landscaping
work the property on which the landscaping work is performed.
(h) A residential general contractor licensed under ORS  chapter 701 who performs landscaping
work if the total value of the landscaping is less than  $2,500 per residential dwelling and the land-
scaping work is performed on residential property for  which the contractor is under contract for the
construction of a new dwelling. The exception  provided by this paragraph does not apply to the
performance  of  irrigation work by a residential general contractor. The State Landscape Contrac-
tors Board shall revise the amount specified in this paragraph every five years, beginning in 2003,
based on changes  in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items),
as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
(i) A residential general  contractor licensed under ORS chapter 701 who performs landscaping
work on residential property that is directly  related to local building code requirements or occu-
pancy ordinances including, but not limited to, the  placement of street trees. The exception provided
by this paragraph does not apply to the  performance of irrigation work by a residential general
contractor.
(j) A person engaged in making plans or drawings for  the selection, placement or use of plants
or other site  features, unless the plans or drawings are for the purpose of providing construction
details and specifications.
(k) Use by a person other than a  landscape construction professional of the title “landscape
designer” when engaged in making plans or drawings described in paragraph (j) of this subsection.
(L) A person providing  recommendations or written specifications for soil amendments or
planting media if  the recommendations or specifications are solely for the purpose of plant instal-
lation.
(m) A plumbing contractor licensed under ORS  447.010 to 447.156 when engaged in superin-
tending installation work on piping for an irrigation system designed by  a landscape contracting
business or by a person registered under ORS 671.310 to 671.459.
(n) A plumbing  contractor licensed under ORS 447.010 to 447.156 when engaged in superintend-
ing repair or maintenance work on piping for an irrigation system.
(o) A journeyman plumber licensed under ORS chapter 693  when performing an installation for
a plumbing contractor described in  paragraph (m) of this subsection or performing repair or main-
tenance work on piping for an irrigation system.
Enrolled House Bill 2800 (HB 2800-A) Page 10
(p) An employee, as defined in ORS 657.015, of a residential  general contractor licensed under
ORS chapter 701 when performing work that the contractor may perform  under paragraph (h) or (i)
of this subsection.
(q) An employee of a licensed landscape contracting business when performing work for the
business under the direct supervision of a licensed landscape construction professional.
(r) [ An employee of a worker leasing company ] A covered employee  of the client of a profes-
sional employer organization  or  an employee  of a  temporary service provider, [ both] as defined
in [ ORS 656.850] section 2 of this 2025 Act , when performing  work for a licensed landscape con-
tracting business under the direct supervision of a licensed landscape construction professional.
(2) ORS 671.530 (2), (4) and (5) apply to a person described under subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 671.562 is amended to read:
671.562. (1) A landscape contracting business that qualifies  under ORS 671.525 to be classified
as a nonexempt  independent contractor must maintain workers’ compensation insurance coverage
in effect for all employees of the landscape contracting business.
(2)(a) A landscape contracting business licensee that qualifies under ORS 671.525 to be classified
as an exempt independent contractor, and that [ has entered into a contract with a worker leasing
company or temporary service provider for the supplying of workers to  the landscaping business, must
verify that workers’  compensation insurance coverage is maintained in effect for all leasing company
or service provider employees supplied for use by the business. ] is the client of a professional em-
ployer organization or has contracted with  a temporary service provider to supply workers
to the landscaping business, must verify that the professional employer organization  or
temporary service provider maintains workers’ compensation insurance coverage.
(b) As  used in this subsection, [ “worker leasing company” ] “professional employer organiza-
tion”  and  “temporary service provider” have the meanings given those terms [ under ORS 656.850 ]
in section 2 of this 2025 Act .
SECTION 16.  ORS 671.565 is amended to read:
671.565. (1) Each person applying for a landscape contracting business license must:
(a) Pay to the State Landscape Contractors Board the applicable landscape  contracting business
license fee established by the board under ORS 671.650.
(b) Have a landscape construction professional  license or employ at least one person with a
landscape construction professional license to supervise the landscaping operation of the business.
(c) Submit the names of all employees who are licensed landscape construction professionals.
(d) File with the board a form of security acceptable under ORS 671.690.
(e) File with the board a certificate of  public liability, personal injury and property damage in-
surance covering the work  of the landscape contracting business that is subject to ORS 671.510 to
671.760 for an amount not less than $500,000.
(f) Indicate, as set  forth in ORS 670.600, the basis under which the applicant qualifies as an in-
dependent contractor and the class of independent contractor described in ORS 671.525 for which
the applicant qualifies.
(2)(a) If an applicant for licensing under this section qualifies to be classified as  a nonexempt
independent contractor, the applicant shall provide the employer identification number of the ap-
plicant and evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant provides workers’  compensation
insurance coverage for all employees of the landscape contracting business.
(b) If an applicant for licensing under this section qualifies to be classified as an exempt  inde-
pendent contractor and [ has entered into a contract with a worker leasing company or temporary
service provider for the supplying of ] is the client of a professional employer organization or  has
contracted with a temporary service provider to supply  workers to  the landscape contracting
business, the applicant shall provide evidence  satisfactory to the board that the applicant has veri-
fied the maintenance of workers’ compensation insurance coverage for [ all leasing company or ser-
vice provider employees supplied for use by the business ] the professional employer organization
or temporary service provider .
Enrolled House Bill 2800 (HB 2800-A) Page 11
(c) As used in this [ paragraph] subsection, [“worker leasing  company” ] “professional employer
organization”  and “temporary service provider” have the meanings given those terms in  [ ORS
656.850] section 2 of this 2025 Act .
(3) At the time of application for a license,  for renewal of a license in active status or for return
of a license to active status, the applicant shall provide evidence satisfactory to the board that the
public liability, personal injury and property damage insurance required by  this section and any
workers’ compensation required of the applicant under ORS 671.527 or  671.562 is in effect. During
a license period, the licensee shall provide, to the extent required by the  board, satisfactory evi-
dence of continued public liability, personal injury and property damage insurance  coverage and, if
required under ORS 671.562, workers’ compensation insurance coverage.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 701.005 is amended to read:
701.005. As used in this chapter:
(1) “Board” means the Construction Contractors Board.
(2) “Commercial contractor” means a licensed contractor that holds an endorsement as a:
(a) Commercial general contractor level 1;
(b) Commercial specialty contractor level 1;
(c) Commercial general contractor level 2;
(d) Commercial specialty contractor level 2; or
(e) Commercial developer.
(3) “Commercial developer” means a developer of property that is zoned for  or intended for use
compatible with a small commercial or large commercial structure.
(4) “Construction debt” means an amount owed:
(a) Under an order or arbitration award  issued by the board that has become final by operation
of law;
(b) Under a judgment, arbitration award or civil penalty that has become final  by operation of
law arising from construction activities within the United States;
(c) Under a judgment or civil penalty that has become  final by operation of law arising from a
failure to comply with ORS 656.017; or
(d) To employees of a construction contracting business for unpaid wages.
(5) “Contractor” means any of the following:
(a) A person that, for compensation  or with the intent to sell, arranges or undertakes or offers
to undertake or  submits a bid to construct, alter, repair, add to, subtract from, improve, inspect,
move, wreck  or demolish, for another, a building, highway, road, railroad, excavation or other
structure, project, development or improvement attached to real estate, or to do any part thereof.
(b) A person that purchases or  owns property and constructs or for compensation arranges for
the construction of one or more  residential structures or small commercial structures with the in-
tent of selling the structures.
(c) A school district, as defined in ORS 332.002, that permits  students to construct a residential
structure or small commercial structure as an educational experience  to learn building techniques
and sells the completed structure.
(d) A community college district, as defined in ORS 341.005, that  permits students to construct
a residential structure or small commercial structure as an educational experience to learn building
techniques and sells the completed structure.
(e) A person except a landscape contracting business,  nurseryman, gardener or person engaged
in the  commercial harvest of forest products, that is engaged as an independent contractor to re-
move trees, prune trees, remove tree limbs or stumps or to engage in tree or limb guying.
(f) A business that supplies the services of a  home inspector certified under ORS 701.445 or a
cross-connection inspector and backflow assembly tester certified under ORS 448.279.
(g) A person that for compensation arranges, undertakes, offers  to undertake or submits a bid
to clean or service chimneys.
(h) A person that arranges for, undertakes, offers to undertake or submits a bid for  the per-
formance of restoration work as defined in ORS 701.540.
Enrolled House Bill 2800 (HB 2800-A) Page 12
(6) “Developer” means a contractor that owns property or an  interest in property and engages
in the business of arranging for  construction work or performing other activities associated with the
improvement of real property, with the intent to sell the property.
(7)(a) “General contractor” means a contractor whose  business operations require the use of
more than two  unrelated building trades or crafts that the contractor supervises or performs in
whole or part, whenever  the sum of all contracts on any single property, including materials and
labor, exceeds an amount established by rule by the board.
(b) “General contractor” does not mean a  specialty contractor or a residential limited contrac-
tor.
(8)(a) “Home improvement” means  a renovation, remodel, repair or alteration by a residential
contractor to an existing owner-occupied:
(A) Residence that is a site-built home;
(B) Condominium, rental residential unit or other residential dwelling  unit that is part of a
larger structure, if the property interest in  the unit is separate from the property interest in the
larger structure;
(C) Modular home constructed off-site;
(D) Manufactured dwelling; or
(E) Floating home, as defined in ORS 830.700.
(b) “Home improvement” does not include a renovation, remodel, repair or alteration  by a resi-
dential contractor:
(A) To  a structure that contains one or more dwelling units and is four stories or less above
grade; or
(B) That the residential contractor performed  in the course of constructing a new residential
structure.
(9)(a) “Home inspector” means a person who, for a  fee, inspects and provides written reports
on the overall physical condition of a residential structure.
(b) “Home inspector” does not include persons certified under ORS chapter 455 to inspect  new,
repaired or altered structures for compliance with the state building code.
(10) “Key  employee” means an employee or owner of a contractor who is a corporate officer,
manager, superintendent,  foreperson or lead person or any other employee the board identifies by
rule.
(11) “Large commercial structure” means a structure that is not a residential structure or  small
commercial structure.
(12) “Officer” means any of the following persons:
(a) A president, vice president, secretary, treasurer or director of a corporation.
(b) A general partner in a limited partnership.
(c) A manager in a manager-managed limited liability company.
(d) A member of a member-managed limited liability company.
(e) A trustee.
(f) A  person the board defines by rule as an officer. The definition of officer adopted by board
rule may include persons not  listed in this subsection who may exercise substantial control over a
business.
(13) “PEO relationship” has the meaning given that term in section 2 of this 2025 Act.
(14) “Professional employer organization” has the meaning  given that term in section 2
of this 2025 Act.
[(13)] (15) “Residential contractor” means a licensed contractor that holds  an endorsement as
a:
(a) Residential general contractor;
(b) Residential specialty contractor;
(c) Residential limited contractor;
(d) Residential developer;
(e) Residential locksmith services contractor;
Enrolled House Bill 2800 (HB 2800-A) Page 13
(f) Residential restoration contractor;
(g) Home inspector services contractor;
(h) Home services contractor; or
(i) Home energy performance score contractor.
[(14)] (16) “Residential  developer” means a developer of property that is zoned for or intended
for use compatible with a residential or small commercial structure.
[(15)(a)] (17)(a) “Residential structure” means:
(A) A residence that is a site-built home;
(B) A structure that contains one or more dwelling units and is four stories  or less above grade;
(C) A condominium, rental residential unit or other residential dwelling unit that is part of  a
larger structure, if the property interest in  the unit is separate from the property interest in the
larger structure;
(D) A modular home constructed off-site;
(E) A manufactured dwelling;
(F) A floating home as defined in ORS 830.700; or
(G) An appurtenance to a home,  structure, unit or dwelling described in subparagraphs (A) to
(F) of this paragraph.
(b) “Residential structure” does not mean:
(A) Subject  to paragraph (a)(C) of this subsection, a structure that contains both residential and
nonresidential  units;
(B) Transient lodging;
(C) A residential school or residence hall;
(D) A state or local correctional facility;
(E) A youth correction facility as defined in ORS 420.005;
(F) A youth care center operated by a county juvenile department under administrative  control
of a juvenile court pursuant to ORS 420.855 to 420.885;
(G) A detention facility as defined in ORS 419A.004;
(H) A nursing home;
(I) A hospital; or
(J) A place constructed primarily for recreational activities.
[(16)] (18) “Responsible managing individual” means an individual who:
(a) Is an owner described in ORS 701.094 or an employee of the business;
(b) Exercises management or  supervisory authority, as defined by the board by rule, over the
construction activities of the business; and
(c)(A) Successfully completed the training and testing required for  licensing under ORS 701.122
within a period the board identifies by rule;
(B) Demonstrated experience the board requires by rule; or
(C) Complied with the licensing requirements of ORS 446.395.
[(17)] (19) “Small commercial structure” means:
(a) A nonresidential structure that has a ground area of 10,000  square feet or less, including
exterior walls, and a height of not more than 20 feet from the top surface  of the lowest flooring to
the highest interior overhead finish of the structure;
(b) A nonresidential leasehold, rental unit or other unit that is  part of a larger structure, if the
unit has a ground area of 12,000 square feet  or less, excluding exterior walls, and a height of not
more than 20 feet from the top surface  of the lowest flooring to the highest interior overhead finish
of the unit;
(c) A nonresidential structure of any size for which the contract price of all  construction con-
tractor work to be performed on the structure  as part of a construction project does not total more
than $250,000; or
(d) An appurtenance to a structure or unit described in paragraphs (a) to (c)  of this subsection.
[(18)] (20) “Specialty contractor” means a contractor who  performs work on a structure, project,
development or improvement and whose operations as such  do not fall within the definition of
Enrolled House Bill 2800 (HB 2800-A) Page 14
“general contractor.” “Specialty contractor” includes a  person who performs work regulated under
ORS 446.395.
[(19) “Worker leasing company” means a person licensed under ORS 656.850 (2)  to perform the
service of providing nontemporary workers by contract and for a fee to work for a client. ]
[(20)] (21) “Zero-lot-line dwelling” means a single-family dwelling unit constructed in a group of
attached units in which:
(a) Each attached unit extends from foundation to roof with open space on two sides; and
(b) Each dwelling unit is separated by a property line.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 701.010 is amended to read:
701.010. The Construction Contractors Board may adopt rules  to make licensure optional for
persons who offer, bid or undertake to perform work peripheral to  construction, as defined by ad-
ministrative rule of the board. The following persons are exempt from licensure under this chapter:
(1) A person who is constructing, altering, improving or repairing personal property.
(2) A person who is constructing, altering, improving or repairing a structure  located within the
boundaries of any site or reservation under the jurisdiction of the federal government.
(3) A person who furnishes materials, supplies, equipment or finished product  and does not fab-
ricate them into, or consume them, in the performance of the work of a contractor.
(4) A person working on one structure or project, under one or more contracts, when the  ag-
gregate price of all of that person’s contracts  for labor, materials and all other items is less than
$1,000 and such work is of a casual,  minor or inconsequential nature. This subsection does not apply
to a person who advertises or puts out  any sign or card or other device that might indicate to the
public that the person is a contractor.
(5) An owner who contracts for work to be performed by a  licensed contractor. This subsection
does not apply to a person who, in the pursuit of an independent business,  constructs, remodels,
repairs or for compensation and with the intent to sell the structure,  arranges to have constructed,
remodeled or repaired a structure with the intent of  offering the structure for sale before, upon or
after completion. It is  prima facie evidence that there was an intent of offering the structure for sale
if the person who constructed, remodeled or repaired the structure or arranged  to have the struc-
ture constructed, remodeled or repaired does not occupy the structure after its completion.
(6) An owner who contracts for one or more licensed contractors to  perform work wholly or
partially within the same calendar year on not  more than three existing residential structures of the
owner. This subsection does not apply to an owner  contracting for work that requires a building
permit unless the work that requires a permit is performed by, or under the direction of, a  resi-
dential general contractor.
(7) A person  performing work on a property that person owns or performing work as the owner’s
employee, whether the property is occupied by the  owner or not, or a person performing work on
that person’s residence, whether or not that  person owns the residence. This subsection does not
apply to a person performing work on a structure owned  by that person or the owner’s employee,
if the work is performed in the pursuit of an independent business with the intent of offering  the
structure for sale before, upon or after completion.
(8) A person licensed or registered in one of  the following trades or professions when operating
within the scope of that license or registration:
(a) An architect registered by the State Board of Architect Examiners.
(b) A professional engineer registered by the State Board of Examiners for Engineering  and
Land Surveying.
(c) A water well contractor licensed by the Water Resources Department.
(d) A sewage disposal system installer licensed by the Department of Environmental Quality.
(e) A landscape contracting business licensed under ORS 671.510 to 671.760.
(f) A  pesticide operator licensed under ORS 634.116 who does not conduct inspections for wood
destroying organisms for the transfer of real estate.
(g) An appraiser certified or licensed under ORS chapter 674 or an appraiser assistant registered
under ORS chapter 674 by the Appraiser Certification and Licensure Board.
Enrolled House Bill 2800 (HB 2800-A) Page 15
(9) A landscape contracting  business operating within the scope of a license issued under ORS
671.510 to 671.760 that:
(a) Constructs fences, decks, arbors, patios, landscape edging,  driveways, walkways or retaining
walls and meets the applicable bonding requirements under ORS 671.690; or
(b) Subcontracts to a licensed plumbing contractor, or otherwise arranges for a  licensed
plumbing contractor to perform, the installation of an  irrigation system described in ORS 671.540
(1)(m) or the repair or maintenance of an irrigation system.
(10) A person who performs work subject to this chapter as an employee of a contractor.
(11) A manufacturer of a  manufactured home constructed under standards established by the
federal government.
(12) A person involved in the movement of:
(a) Modular buildings or structures other than manufactured structures not in excess of  14 feet
in width.
(b) Structures not in excess of 16  feet in width when the structures are being moved by their
owner if the owner is not a contractor required to be licensed under this chapter.
(13) A surety company,  commercial lending institution, holding company for a commercial lend-
ing institution, subsidiary of a commercial lending institution or  subsidiary of a holding company for
a commercial lending institution that arranges for completion, repair or remodeling by  one or more
licensed contractors of a structure in which the  company, institution, holding company or subsidiary
holds a legal or security  interest. As used in this subsection, “commercial lending institution”
means any bank, mortgage banking company, trust company, savings bank, savings and  loan asso-
ciation, credit union, national banking  association, federal savings and loan association, insurance
company or federal credit union maintaining an office in this state.
(14) A real estate licensee who engages in the management  of rental real estate as defined in
ORS 696.010 or the employee of that licensee when performing work on a structure  that the real
estate licensee manages under a contract.
(15) Units of government other than those specified in ORS 701.005 (5)(c) and (d).
(16) A qualified intermediary in a property exchange that qualifies under section 1031 of the
Internal Revenue  Code as amended and in effect on January 1, 2004, if the qualified intermediary
is not performing construction activities.
(17) A [ worker leasing company ] professional employer organization  or temporary  service
provider, [ both as defined in ORS 656.850, ] as defined in section  2 of this 2025 Act,  that supplies
personnel to a licensed contractor for the performance of work under the direction  and supervision
of the contractor or that has entered into a PEO relationship with the contractor .
(18) City or county inspectors acting under ORS 701.225 or inspectors described in ORS 455.715.
(19) A person performing  work for purposes of agricultural drainage, agricultural trenching or
agricultural irrigation or involving the construction of agricultural fences to control livestock.
(20) A person performing  work that is subject to ORS 527.610 to 527.770 on forestlands for which
notice of operation has been filed under ORS 527.670.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 701.035 is amended to read:
701.035. (1) An applicant must  qualify as an independent contractor under ORS 670.600 to be
eligible for a license with the Construction Contractors Board.
(2) The board shall establish two classes of independent contractor:
(a) The nonexempt class is composed of the following entities:
(A) Sole proprietorships, partnerships, corporations and limited liability companies:
(i) With one or more employees; or
(ii) That [ utilize one or more workers  supplied by a worker leasing company ] have a PEO re-
lationship.
(B) Partnerships, corporations and limited liability companies  with more than two partners,
corporate officers or members, if any of the  partners, corporate officers or members are not part
of the same family and related as parents, spouses, sisters, brothers, daughters or  sons, daughters-
in-law or sons-in-law or grandchildren.
Enrolled House Bill 2800 (HB 2800-A) Page 16
(b) The exempt class is composed of all sole proprietorships, partnerships, corporations and
limited liability companies that do not qualify as nonexempt.
(3)(a) If a person who is  licensed as exempt under subsection (2)(b) of this section hires one or
more employees, [ utilizes one or more workers supplied by a worker leasing  company ] enters into a
PEO relationship or falls into any of the categories set out in subsection (2)(a)(B) of  this section,
the person is subject to penalties under ORS 701.992 for improper licensing.
(b) If a person who is licensed as exempt under subsection  (2)(b) of this section hires one or
more employees, or [ utilizes one or more  workers supplied by a worker leasing company ] enters into
a PEO relationship , the person is also subject to licensing sanctions under ORS 701.098.
(c) [The] A person described in this subsection must reapply to the board  in the correct class.
(4) The decision of  the board that a person is an independent contractor applies only when the
person is performing work of the nature described in ORS 701.021.
(5) A person that is within the exempt class described in subsection (2)(b) of this  section and is
licensed as a commercial contractor  shall procure and maintain workers’ compensation insurance
as authorized by ORS 656.128.
SECTION 20.  ORS 701.098 is amended to read:
701.098. (1) The Construction Contractors Board may  revoke, suspend, condition or refuse to
issue or reissue a license and may assess a civil penalty as provided in ORS 701.992 if the board
determines after notice and opportunity for hearing that a licensee or applicant:
(a) Violated a provision of this chapter.
(b) Violated a rule or order of the board.
(c) Entered into a  settlement agreement with another person under ORS 701.145 but failed to
comply with the terms of the settlement agreement.
(d) Is a business entity or is the owner, director, officer or partner  of a business entity or of a
reorganized business entity, as defined in ORS 305.330, that  was subject to a revocation or suspen-
sion of a license, or subject  to a civil or criminal penalty, imposed under this chapter or ORS
chapter 447, 455, 460 or 693, or under the laws of another  state, and the revocation, suspension or
civil or criminal penalty was related to the licensee’s or applicant’s engaging in construction.
(e) Submitted an application to the board that, at the time the board issued or renewed the li-
cense or denied the application, was  incomplete in any material respect or included a statement that
was incorrect or misleading in light of  the circumstances in which the licensee or applicant made
the statement.
(f) Knowingly assisted an unlicensed person to act in violation of this chapter.
(g) Knowingly assisted a licensed contractor to perform work for which the  contractor is not
properly endorsed.
(h) Wrongfully failed  to perform a contractual duty to pay money to a person and the failure
caused the person to file a lien on a structure under ORS 87.001 to 87.093.
(i) Knowingly provided false information to the board.
(j) Worked without a construction permit where a permit is required and the work  resulted in
a complaint being filed with the board under ORS 701.139. For purposes of this  paragraph, “con-
struction permit” includes a building permit, electrical permit, mechanical permit or plumbing  per-
mit.
(k) Worked together with another contractor on the same task on the same job site, where one
of the contractors was classed as exempt under ORS 701.035 (2)(b) and the  number of contractors
working together exceeded the following:
(A) Two sole proprietors;
(B) One partnership;
(C) One corporation; or
(D) One limited liability company.
(L) Was convicted, or an owner, director, officer or partner of the licensee or  applicant was
convicted, consistent with ORS 670.280,  of one of the following crimes in this state or an equivalent
crime in another state:
Enrolled House Bill 2800 (HB 2800-A) Page 17
(A) Murder;
(B) Assault in the first degree;
(C) Kidnapping;
(D) Rape, sodomy or unlawful sexual penetration;
(E) Sexual abuse;
(F) Arson in the first degree;
(G) Robbery in the first degree;
(H) Theft in the first degree; or
(I) Extortion.
(m) Did not pay  another person for supplying labor or materials contracted for under a public
improvement contract, plus the amount  of interest due, within 90 days after receiving payment from
a contracting agency or, if the licensee or applicant was a subcontractor, from a contractor.
(n) Repeatedly reported bad faith or false complaints  of nonpayment against contractors or
subcontractors.
(o) Engaged in conduct as a contractor that was dishonest or fraudulent and that the board finds
injurious to the welfare of the public.
(p) Hired employees while licensed as exempt under ORS 701.035.
(q) [ Used one or more workers supplied by a worker leasing company ] Entered into a PEO re-
lationship while licensed as exempt under ORS 701.035.
(2) The board  may revoke, suspend, condition or refuse to issue or reissue a license if the board
determines after notice and opportunity  for hearing that a licensee or applicant is unfit for licensure
based upon information submitted to the  board under ORS 701.046, submitted in a registration of
securities described in ORS 701.046 (2) or discovered by a board investigation under ORS 701.225.
(3) The board  may assess a civil penalty against any person as provided in ORS 701.992 if the
board determines after notice and opportunity for hearing that the person violated ORS 701.021.
(4)(a) The administrator of the board, in accordance  with administrative rules adopted by the
board and after setting  forth specific reasons for the findings, may suspend or refuse to renew a li-
cense without hearing  in any case where the administrator finds a serious danger to the public
welfare, including but not limited to:
(A) Lack of a surety bond required by ORS 701.068;
(B) Lack of liability insurance required by ORS 701.073;
(C) Hiring employees while classed as exempt under ORS 701.035;
(D) [ Using one or more workers supplied  by a worker leasing company ] Entering into a PEO
relationship while classed as exempt under ORS 701.035;
(E) Conduct as a construction contractor that is dishonest or fraudulent;
(F) Failure to pay a construction debt; or
(G) Entering into  a settlement agreement under ORS 701.145 and failing to comply with the
terms of the settlement agreement.
(b) If the licensee or applicant demands a hearing within  90 days after the date of notice to the
licensee or applicant of the suspension or refusal to renew, then a hearing must be  granted to the
licensee or applicant as soon as practicable after  the demand, and the administrator shall issue,
pursuant to the hearing as required by  ORS chapter 183, an order confirming, altering or revoking
the administrator’s earlier order. Notwithstanding  ORS 670.325, a hearing need not be held where
the order of suspension or refusal to renew is accompanied by or is pursuant  to a citation for vio-
lation that is subject to judicial determination in any court of  this state, and the order by its terms
will terminate in case of final judgment in favor of the licensee or applicant.
(5)(a) In addition to all other remedies, if the board has reason to believe  that a person is en-
gaging in an act, practice or transaction that violates this chapter or a board  rule, the board may
issue an order directing the person to cease the act or to take corrective action.
(b) The board shall mail a  copy of an order issued under this subsection to the person by first
class mail with certificate of mailing. The board shall include  with the order a notice informing the
person of the right to request a hearing concerning the order. The notice shall  inform the person
Enrolled House Bill 2800 (HB 2800-A) Page 18
that any hearing request must be received by the board no later than  21 days after the date the
order was mailed by the board.
(c) If the board receives a timely request for a  hearing concerning an order issued under this
subsection, the board shall schedule the hearing no later than 30 days after receiving the  request.
The board  shall mail written notice of the hearing to the person by first class mail with certificate
of mailing no later than seven days before the scheduled hearing date.
(d) An order described in this subsection becomes final if the person does not file  a timely re-
quest for a hearing concerning the order or fails to appear at the requested hearing as scheduled.
(e) The issuance of a board order under this subsection is subject to ORS 183.413 to 183.497.
(6) In addition to all other remedies,  if the board determines that a person has engaged in, or
is engaging  in, any act, practice or transaction that violates the provisions of this chapter, the board
may direct the Attorney  General or the district attorney of the county in which the act, practice
or transaction occurs, to apply to the court  for an injunction restraining the person from violating
the provisions of this chapter. An injunction may not issue for failure to maintain the  list provided
for in ORS 701.345, unless the court determines that the failure is intentional.
(7) A certified copy of the record  of conviction is conclusive evidence of a conviction under
subsection (1)(L) of this section.
(8) If the board suspends  or revokes the license of an individual contractor or contractor busi-
ness for a violation of subsection (1)(k) of this  section, the board may not restore or reissue the li-
cense unless the individual contractor or a responsible managing  individual for the contractor
business has successfully completed the training and testing described in ORS 701.122.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 701.470 is amended to read:
701.470. (1) As used in this section:
(a)(A) “Construction flagger”  means an individual who, for compensation or with the expectation
of compensation, directs or controls the flow of motor vehicle traffic  on a public roadway to prevent
or reduce conflict between the flow of traffic and construction activity on or near the roadway.
(B) “Construction flagger” does not mean  an individual performing work for the federal gov-
ernment, a public body as defined in ORS 174.109 or a business regulated by  the Public Utility
Commission.
(b) “Construction flagging contractor” means a person who employs, contracts with , or [ obtains
through a worker leasing company ] enters into a PEO  relationship with respect to , one or more
individuals to act as construction flaggers.
(2) Except as provided in this section, a person may not undertake, offer to undertake or submit
a bid to do work as a construction flagging contractor unless  the person holds a construction flag-
ging contractor license issued by the Construction Contractors Board.
(3) This section does not  require a person to obtain a construction flagging contractor license
if the person holds a valid license and endorsement as a:
(a) Residential general contractor;
(b) Commercial general contractor level 1;
(c) Commercial specialty contractor level 1;
(d) Commercial general contractor level 2; or
(e) Commercial specialty contractor level 2.
(4) An applicant for a construction flagging contractor license must:
(a) Submit an application in the manner described in ORS 701.046;
(b) Obtain a surety bond under ORS 701.068 in the amount of $25,000; and
(c) Obtain  general liability insurance under ORS 701.073 in an amount of not less than $500,000.
(5) A construction flagging contractor license authorizes  a person to act as a construction
flagging contractor but does not authorize the person to engage  in any other activities that require
a license issued under this chapter.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the board may not:
(a) Impose training or continuing education requirements for a  construction flagging contractor
or a responsible managing individual for the contractor.
Enrolled House Bill 2800 (HB 2800-A) Page 19
(b) Require a construction flagging contractor or the responsible managing individual for  the
contractor to take a  test measuring the knowledge of the contractor or responsible managing indi-
vidual regarding business practices and laws affecting construction contractors.
SECTION 22.  ORS 656.005, as amended  by section 110, chapter 73, Oregon Laws 2024, is
amended to read:
656.005. (1) “Average weekly wage” means the Oregon average weekly wage in covered  em-
ployment, as determined by  the Employment Department, for the last quarter of the calendar year
preceding the fiscal year in which the injury occurred.
(2)(a) “Beneficiary” means an injured worker, and the spouse in a marriage, child or  dependent
of a worker, who is entitled to receive payments under this chapter.
(b) “Beneficiary” does  not include a person who intentionally causes the compensable injury to
or death of an injured worker.
(3) “Board” means the Workers’ Compensation Board.
(4) “Carrier-insured  employer” means an employer who provides workers’ compensation cover-
age with the State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation  or an insurer authorized under ORS
chapter 731 to transact workers’ compensation insurance in this state.
(5) “Child” means a child of an injured worker, including:
(a) A posthumous child;
(b) A child legally adopted before the injury;
(c) A child toward whom the worker stands in loco parentis;
(d) A child born out of wedlock;
(e) A stepchild, if the stepchild was, at the time of the injury, a  member of the worker’s family
and substantially dependent upon the worker for support; and
(f) A child of any age who was incapacitated  at the time of the accident and thereafter remains
incapacitated and substantially dependent on the worker for support.
(6) “Claim” means a written request  for compensation from a subject worker or someone on the
worker’s behalf, or any compensable injury of which a subject employer has notice or knowledge.
(7)(a) A  “compensable injury” is an accidental injury, or accidental injury to prosthetic appli-
ances, arising out of and in the course of employment requiring  medical services or resulting in
disability or death. An injury is accidental if the  result is an accident, whether or not due to acci-
dental means, if it is established by  medical evidence supported by objective findings, subject to the
following  limitations:
(A) An injury  or disease is not compensable as a consequence of a compensable injury unless
the compensable injury is the major contributing cause of the consequential condition.
(B) If an  otherwise compensable injury combines at any time with a preexisting condition to
cause or prolong disability or a need for  treatment, the combined condition is compensable only if,
so long as and to the extent that the otherwise compensable injury is the major contributing cause
of the disability of the combined condition or the major  contributing cause of the need for treatment
of the combined condition.
(b) “Compensable injury” does not include:
(A) Injury to any active participant in  assaults or combats that are not connected to the job
assignment and that amount to a deviation from customary duties;
(B) Injury incurred while  engaging in or performing, or as the result of engaging in or per-
forming, any recreational or social activities primarily for the worker’s personal pleasure; or
(C) Injury the major contributing  cause of which is demonstrated to be by a preponderance of
the evidence the injured worker’s consumption of  alcoholic beverages or cannabis or the unlawful
consumption of any controlled substance, unless the employer permitted, encouraged or had  actual
knowledge of such consumption.
(c) A “disabling compensable injury” is an injury that entitles the worker to  compensation for
disability or death. An injury is not disabling if no temporary benefits are  due and payable, unless
there is a reasonable expectation that permanent disability will result from the injury.
(d) A “nondisabling compensable injury” is any injury that requires medical services only.
Enrolled House Bill 2800 (HB 2800-A) Page 20
(8) “Compensation” includes all  benefits, including medical services, provided for a compensable
injury to a subject worker or the worker’s beneficiaries by an insurer or self-insured employer  pur-
suant to this chapter.
(9) “Department” means the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(10) “Dependent” means any of the following individuals who, at the time of  an accident, de-
pended in whole or in part for the individual’s support on the earnings of a worker who dies  as a
result of an injury:
(a) A parent of a worker or the parent’s spouse or domestic partner;
(b) A grandparent of a worker or the grandparent’s spouse or domestic partner;
(c) A grandchild of a worker or the grandchild’s spouse or domestic partner;
(d) A sibling  or stepsibling of a worker or the sibling’s or stepsibling’s spouse or domestic
partner; and
(e) Any individual  related by blood or affinity whose close association with a worker is the
equivalent of a family relationship.
(11) “Director” means the Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services.
(12)(a) “Doctor” or  “physician” means a person duly licensed to practice one or more of the
healing arts in any country or in any state, territory or  possession of the United States within the
limits of the license of the licensee.
(b) Except as otherwise provided for workers subject to a managed  care contract, “attending
physician” means a doctor, physician or physician associate who  is primarily responsible for the
treatment of a worker’s compensable injury and who is:
(A) A physician licensed under ORS 677.100 to 677.228 by the Oregon Medical Board,  or a
podiatric physician and surgeon licensed  under ORS 677.805 to 677.840 by the Oregon Medical
Board, an oral and maxillofacial surgeon licensed by the Oregon Board of Dentistry or a similarly
licensed doctor in any country or in any state, territory or possession of the United States;
(B) For  a cumulative total of 60 days from the first visit on the initial claim or for a cumulative
total of 18 visits, whichever occurs  first, to any of the medical service providers listed in this sub-
paragraph, a:
(i) Doctor or physician licensed by the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners for the State of
Oregon under ORS chapter 684 or a similarly licensed  doctor or physician in any country or in any
state, territory or possession of the United States; or
(ii) Doctor of naturopathy or naturopathic physician licensed by  the Oregon Board of
Naturopathic Medicine under ORS chapter 685  or a similarly licensed doctor or physician in any
country or in any state, territory or possession of the United States; or
(C) For a cumulative total of 180 days from the first  visit on the initial claim, a physician as-
sociate  licensed  by the Oregon Medical Board in accordance with ORS 677.505 to 677.525 or a sim-
ilarly licensed physician associate in  any country or in any state, territory or possession of the
United States.
(c) Except as otherwise provided for workers subject to a managed care  contract, “attending
physician” does not include a physician who provides care  in a hospital emergency room and refers
the injured worker to a primary care physician for follow-up care and treatment.
(d) “Consulting physician” means a doctor or physician  who examines a worker or the worker’s
medical record to advise the  attending physician or nurse practitioner authorized to provide
compensable medical services under ORS 656.245 regarding treatment  of a worker’s compensable
injury.
(13)(a) “Employer” means any person, including receiver, administrator, executor  or trustee, and
the state, state agencies, counties, municipal corporations, school  districts and other public corpo-
rations or political subdivisions, that contracts to pay  a remuneration for the services of any
worker.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a)  of this subsection, for purposes of this chapter, the client of
a temporary service provider is not the employer of temporary workers  provided by the temporary
service provider.
Enrolled House Bill 2800 (HB 2800-A) Page 21
(c) As used in paragraph (b) of  this subsection, “temporary service provider” has the meaning
given that term in [ ORS 656.850] section 2 of this 2025 Act .
(d) For the purposes of this chapter, “subject employer” means an  employer that is subject to
this chapter as provided in ORS 656.023.
(14) “Insurer” means the State Accident  Insurance Fund Corporation or an insurer authorized
under ORS chapter 731 to transact workers’ compensation insurance in this  state or an assigned
claims agent selected by the director under ORS 656.054.
(15) “Consumer and Business Services Fund” means the fund created by ORS 705.145.
(16) “Incapacitated” means an individual is physically or mentally unable to earn a livelihood.
(17) “Medically stationary”  means that no further material improvement would reasonably be
expected from medical treatment or the passage of time.
(18) “Noncomplying employer” means a subject employer that has failed to comply with  ORS
656.017.
(19) “Objective  findings” in support of medical evidence are verifiable indications of injury or
disease that may include,  but are not limited to, range of motion, atrophy, muscle strength and
palpable muscle spasm. “Objective findings” does not include physical findings or subjective re-
sponses to physical examinations that are not reproducible, measurable or observable.
(20) “Palliative care” means  medical service rendered to reduce or moderate temporarily the
intensity of an otherwise stable medical condition, but does not include those  medical services ren-
dered to diagnose, heal or permanently alleviate or eliminate a medical condition.
(21) “Party” means  a claimant for compensation, the employer of the injured worker at the time
of injury and the insurer, if any, of the employer.
(22) “Payroll” means a record of wages  payable to workers for their services and includes
commissions, value of exchange labor and the reasonable value  of board, rent, housing, lodging or
similar advantage received from the  employer. However, “payroll” does not include overtime pay,
vacation pay, bonus pay,  tips, amounts payable under profit-sharing agreements or bonus payments
to reward workers for safe  working practices. Bonus pay is limited to payments that are not antic-
ipated under the contract of employment and that are paid  at the sole discretion of the employer.
The exclusion from payroll of bonus payments to reward workers for safe  working practices is only
for the purpose of  calculations based on payroll to determine premium for workers’ compensation
insurance, and does not affect any other calculation or determination  based on payroll for the pur-
poses of this chapter.
(23) “Person”  includes a partnership, joint venture, association, limited liability company and
corporation.
(24)(a) “Preexisting condition”  means, for all industrial injury claims, any injury, disease, con-
genital abnormality, personality disorder or similar condition that contributes to disability  or need
for treatment, provided that:
(A) Except for claims in which a preexisting condition is arthritis or an  arthritic condition, the
worker has been diagnosed with the condition,  or has obtained medical services for the symptoms
of the condition regardless of diagnosis; and
(B)(i) In claims for  an initial injury or omitted condition, the diagnosis or treatment precedes
the initial injury;
(ii) In claims for a new medical condition, the diagnosis or treatment precedes  the onset of the
new medical condition; or
(iii) In claims for a worsening pursuant to ORS 656.273 or  656.278, the diagnosis or treatment
precedes the onset of the worsened condition.
(b) “Preexisting condition” means, for all occupational disease claims, any injury, disease, con-
genital abnormality, personality disorder or similar condition that contributes to disability  or need
for treatment and that precedes the onset of  the claimed occupational disease, or precedes a claim
for worsening in such claims pursuant to ORS 656.273 or 656.278.
(c) For the purposes  of industrial injury claims, a condition does not contribute to disability or
need for treatment if the condition merely renders the worker more susceptible to the injury.
Enrolled House Bill 2800 (HB 2800-A) Page 22
(25) “Self-insured employer” means an employer or  group of employers certified under ORS
656.430 as meeting the qualifications set out by ORS 656.407.
(26) “State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation” and “corporation”  mean the State Accident
Insurance Fund Corporation created under ORS 656.752.
(27) “Wages” means  the money rate at which the service rendered is recompensed under the
contract of hiring in force at the time of  the accident, including reasonable value of board, rent,
housing, lodging or similar advantage received from the employer, and includes the amount of tips
required to be reported by the employer pursuant to section 6053 of the Internal Revenue Code of
1954, as amended, and the  regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, or the amount of actual tips
reported, whichever amount is greater. The  State Accident Insurance Fund Corporation may estab-
lish assumed minimum and maximum wages, in conformity with recognized insurance principles, at
which any  worker shall be carried upon the payroll of the employer for the purpose of determining
the premium of the employer.
(28)(a) “Worker” means any person, other  than an independent contractor, who engages to fur-
nish services for a remuneration, including a minor  whether lawfully or unlawfully employed and
salaried, elected and appointed officials of the state, state agencies,  counties, cities, school districts
and other public corporations, but does not include any person whose services are performed as an
adult in custody or ward of a state institution or  as part of the eligibility requirements for a general
or public assistance grant.
(b) For the purpose of determining entitlement  to temporary disability benefits or permanent
total disability  benefits under this chapter, “worker” does not include a person who has withdrawn
from the workforce during the period for which such benefits are sought.
(c) For the purposes of this chapter, “subject worker” means a worker who is  subject to this
chapter as provided in ORS 656.027.
(29) “Independent contractor” has the meaning given that term in ORS 670.600.
SECTION 23.
(1) Section 2 of this 2025 Act  and the amendments to ORS 653.412, 656.005,
656.018, 656.403, 656.702, 656.850, 656.855, 671.525, 671.527, 671.540,  671.562, 671.565, 701.005,
701.010, 701.035, 701.098, 701.470, 737.270, 743.521 and 743.522 by  sections 3 to 22 of this 2025
Act become operative on July 1, 2027.
(2) The Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services  may take any
action before the operative date  specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary
to enable the director to implement, on and after the operative date specified in subsection
(1) of this  section, the provisions of section 2 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS
653.412, 656.005, 656.018, 656.403, 656.702, 656.850, 656.855, 671.525,  671.527, 671.540, 671.562,
671.565, 701.005, 701.010, 701.035, 701.098, 701.470,  737.270, 743.521 and 743.522 by sections 3 to
22 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 24.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 2800 (HB 2800-A) Page 23
Passed by House April 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 7, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2800 (HB 2800-A) Page 24